The door's open this time. Confidence.

Not confidence, look in his eyes, he's just been a dad long enough to know that the kids own that entire house and there's nothing he can do to stop them. 
He seems like a sweet guy and a nice dad. Glad he is doing well.
He should have rolled with it, and have crazy shit happen every interview.
He's probably wearing pants this time, too.
Or maybe he got rid of his children....
I also like to live dangerously. 
He also really cleaned up the room
I remember when this first happened and everyone was like "oh that's clearly his maid" like a dude living in South Korea with Asian kids wouldn't have a Korean wife
He was on CNN's Smerconish this morning and did the same thing, said he did it to create drama but then admitted that his family is out of town. 
[If you live under a rock](https://www.reddit.com/r/television/comments/5ym24f/guys_children_interupt_bbc_news_interview/)
It was kind of awesome to see how he and his family are in that Korean baby show The Return of Superman. I think he was visited by Sam Hammington.

Edit: fixed show name.
I have a gif some artist made of a little girl stomping around from when this happened. I gotttttaaaa find it. 
Can someone post up the original please I’m out of the loop
Like how the guy always suits up even though he's just at home
I'll bet the sprogs are enjoying some delicious ice-cream or gob-stopping candy.
I’m more concerned about Deadpool sitting in the background. 
Nothing can match the confidence that the child had when she walked the fuck into that room. That kid seemed to know exactly what she was doing and loved every second of it.
Someone explain lol
This time please be grandma on a wheelchair, just cruising......
Hey r/madlads I found a lad thats mad 
The map's gone! It's replaced by regular photos, so it feels more personal :)
And the table is now an actual table!
/r/madlads
His wife and kids are buried under 6 ft of clay dirt in the basement
I love this guy!
Context?
I don’t understand can anyone explain 
Can we get some context?

Is this the guy who, during live(?) television, his child came into the room? 
Really sorry, but can someone provide some context?
Missed the original situation. Can I get some reference love?
Whats the backstory?
Who's this? 
Who the fuck is this
what?
why is this still image funny?
Who is that? Whats with the door? Im so confused right now. 
I also bet he is wearing pants this time
Thats not confidence, thats being home alone.
Finally he doing it right and well prepared this time.
Can someone please explain the context?
This time theyre chained to the radiator.
Who is this and why is it funny?
never forget **#NANNYGATE**
Ok so I never noticed it before, but does anyone else think this guy kinda looks like the unedited version of Bradley Cooper?  Am I imagining that?
Is this a video? For me it's just an image but the comments are getting into weird detail about what is happening.
Lorca before Discovery. 
He’s got my vote
Bet you he doesn't have any pants on
Y'all grown up
Why does this guy get interviewed?
That isn't confidence, that is a man who has a family that is not at home during the interview. Lol
He looks like young Ian Mckellan to me
A video with him, his wife and kids after the original "incident".

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PLMSoD1riE0
Korean reality show about him and his family. 

Don't forget to turn on english subtitles :P



https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hdP8FPiEfnc
If only she went from the Risky Business slide to a casual walk to grab the kids it would have been epic on a different spectrum.
Would have been funny if he’d have barred the door with a chair just as an inside joke.
Oh sad. Does that mean he got a divorce?
i have seen oics with kid. but i dont know whole story. did kid came in and scared him?
Oh no. What has he done with the kid?!?
Electrified razor wire fence just out of view
I’m pretty sure he still isn’t wearing any pants.
Def wearing pants today
This time he made sure they are at the park first.
Who's that guy. What's happening here? 
cages.
Haha!
Kid is handcuffed to a radiator. 
dungeon complete, life is good
Was thinking the exact same thing when I saw it this morning
Haha, maybe Mom took the kids for a walk this time. He took it in amazingly good humour last time, they seem like a sweet family.
I think I missed what this refers too.
Am I missing something? Is this a GIF or an Image. All I see if a guy on a screen. 
OOTL what’s going on?
Its a guy whose kid walked in on him doing an interview last time they did this.
https://i.imgur.com/JBEUUXv.gifv
Optimist.
I dont get it
Fired nanny?  Check.  Fired children? Check.  Its showtime!
ITT: people getting triggered
I'm lost :/, can someone link me to the other Post ? Please and thank you 
https://youtu.be/m3ktsl6_Rpg
Is this a still or video? Waited several minutes and nothing happened
I watched this live, Fucking hilarious
What is this?
Last time his kids opened the door and walked in, his wife had to get them out. The video of it got pretty popular, so now he's just embracing it.
Ah, was it during a news review or something?
Thank you! I get it now hahaha
With the same coat and tie!
I don't get it
Great Jeffrey. Well done.
Much cleaner too, damn
An open door is not nearly as interesting as a closed one.
hot wife
Dude seems like a nightmare when no one is looking. Watch the interview with him and his family. 
I totally agree with you poonjam.  
[Here’s a parody if it had been a woman lol](https://youtu.be/-Ojvk-4IcOE) 
It took me a minute and then I was all oh yeeeaahhh that guy
[deleted]
That's just looks like the bookshelf mate.
Lol. TIL I'm a racist for assuming she was a nanny. It had nothing to do with her skin color though. I assumed that since he was on an international news segment that he understood he would be busy and hired a care taker for the young ones. 

Imagine you're a care taker for some children and you're only job is to keep them out of that room and then they go in there. I would react just like she did... "SHIT SHIT SHIT". It seemed like a plausible explanation without any background but apparently I'm just racist.

Edit: I love that this is downvoted. 
I don’t get this post. Seems like you’re aware of the reference. Can you explain?  Also, I don’t know why you’re getting downvoted either. 
There was video a while back of this guy. He was doing a news segment on air and his kids came through the door. Moments later a frantic woman (who is not white) comes flying into the room and in a panic she quickly yanks the kids out of the room. Really not  a big deal but kind of funny.

Fast forward to today and people are saying you're a racist if you thought she was the kids nanny, because in reality she was the news guys wife.

Like I said in my comment, my assumption she was the nanny had nothing to do with her skin color... But I'm a racist 
This is 2018.

*Anything* you do means you're a racist, including doing nothing.
Someone’s dramatic 

>Someone’s dramatic 

That's racist.

/s
Grow up, dude.
CNN Baby! CNN!!!! (shoutout to Tony Baker)
How is this funny? 
do you know where this comes from?
Do you not know the context?
I don’t. Can someone explain?
https://reddit.com/r/television/comments/5ym24f/guys_children_interupt_bbc_news_interview/
Nah he just killed the kid.
I'm still confused on why they do segments with reporters or whatever in their own home.
Sometimes it's nice to work from home...
Well, let's say you're in New York City, and the world's foremost expert on The Thing You're Running a Segment On lives in Los Angeles. You could fly that guy out, put him up for a night, and generally spend around $2,500 to bring him out for a 10 minute segment, or you could just Skype him for free.
There's a door that is open? HAHAHAHA Holy shit that is so fucking /r/funny!!
There's woosh, then there's WOOSH!. You probably got the latter.
Heh yea brofist to my fellow reddit army members who immediately got this too
In this context, yes... yes it is.
Because you don't know about the content presented.
I’m sensing a /s here. This post humor comes from its backstory. 
If you have to explain a joke, it's not funny.
This was a huge internet story last year. 
Normally yes. But this is what is called an inside joke, one where I'd say 90% of r/funny is in on the joke. You my dear jackass are of the 10% that are not in on the joke and decided to announce that fact in the cuntiest way possible.  
All jokes have to be explain to morons. 
Knock knock.
Who's there?
Who's there?
Power to the proletariat!
I’m pretty sure they are either out with the mom or asleep. I don’t like your negativity and tone of resignation sir/ma’am. Lol
OR this time around those kids are gagged and duct-taped in the hall closet.
If only you knew how wrong you are. Good dad's don't allow their kids to own the house. We know they need some discipline in their lives and if they don't respect you how are you going to teach them anything of value?
Yup, this is 100% a "welp, they're gonna get in anyway" look. 
Having children is willingly subjecting yourself to Stockholm Syndrome.

Source: I have children.
https://imgur.com/a/0RxpEqG
Or he locked them in a different room.
I have kids and can confirm. These tiny demons rule my house with an iron fist.
Pretty sure he murdered his nanny after last time and his kids are in cages in his basement!
That was his wife not a nanny
How do you know?
Hope his wife is doing well after all the white people called her a maid just because she is a different race from her husband

Edit: Hi, are you feeling personally offended that this comment is getting upvoted? Comments making fun of minorities also get tons of upvote all the time, you might not have noticed it because you just chuckled and moved along. If you can dish em out, you gotta be able to take it too; if you can't take it, I suggest you go take shelter at a safe space.
Honestly, the mom was the one who freaked out unnecessarily at the situation. I mean she went into DEF CON 5... or is it 1. 

Anyway, if they had just calmly acknowledged the kids or even had the kids wave to the camera on the way out, it wouldn’t have looked as bad. 
That sweetness might or might not be handy when he arrives naked and alone in an uncertain 2225. 
What the fuck people thought she was a maid?
I'm clearly missing a reference.
For such a nice intro, this entire comments section has really dumped all over the place. 
That's funny, I worked with a few of his students, and according to them he's the furthest thing from sweet and nice.  Apparently he has the ego the size of Kansas and is crude to those under him.  Apparently. 
Not really lol
Isn't this Bill O'Reilly?  
(years ago of course)
Nope, it's [Robert Kelly](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Kelly_(political_analyst\)) political analyst. 
Woosh!
That whole interaction made me cringe. Was that supposed to be funny?
I love how He tried to act normal and how his wife swooped in like a ninja to get the children. It totally cracks me up how the two of them were trying to keep their cool and failed. I also think it is awesome how he continued through the interview. What a champ!
Have a dog charge in, jump on his lap and lick his face
Swat team.
If he tried to have crazy shit happen every interview  he would turn into a sideshow, it would be forced and not as funny.    In turn, he wouldn’t be taken seriously.    
Probably.

...


Maybe.
He was wearing pants the first time around. 
You never know
I haven’t ruled out the generous use of duct tape....
Ed... ward..?
Some Ed...ward stuff perhaps.
It's an older meme, but it check out.
Most underrated comment in all of reddit.
Wat?
New floor boards too... Sometimes you can hear their knocks...
Totes got rid of the *I don't know whether I should get rid of this spare bed that I always leave random crap on*.
I should do a Skype interview on BBC sometimes.   
"So, yes, reporting here from the ruins of Aleppo... oh actually, forget it, this is actually my living room. And I have no kids to show you running around, just a massive addiction to Dota 2"
Even if he weren't living in South Korea, it wouldn't be weird for a white dude to have a Korean wife.
This is what gets me.  The kids were obviously Asian, yet people thought the woman was his maid because it never crossed their minds that he had a foreign spouse.  Then who the hell were those kids?

A very large percentage of Americans living in Korea have Korean spouses.  It's one of the main reasons they stay there for their professional careers.  Wouldn't that be plausible for a diplomat in South Korea?

The Reddit userbase just gets dumber and dumber.
I have yet, outside of this thread to see anyone assume or say that was his maid 
I thought she was a nanny because I’m a woman who works and all my friends with kids do too. I sometimes forget it’s a possibility that women with kids can choose to stay home. Coincidentally my father is white and my mom is asian. 
I have a brown wife. I don't know why, but people assume that white guys only get with white girls. You should see the confusion on people's faces when they see me with my kid.

A midwife cautiously asked me if my wife was white or not in the hospital, clearly thinking that I was not the father...


Those kids are just as much white as they are Asian. 
I remember the cringy as fuck "how a woman  would have handled the situation" video. 
Not trying to be mean but I honestly think the confusion was because she looked very plain, not because she was Asian. 
What does that have to do with the OP? 
I love the way the mom slides into the room gets me every time, she knew she done goofed.
My favourite thing that came from this was the guy who had Vince McMahon strutting in behind the kids. Wish I could find the gif
This is one of those gifs where no matter who you look at, it's funny in its own way. 

The part that gets me is when the freaking saucer baby just floats into the doorway, pauses for *juuust* a moment, then continues rolling in on that contraption as quickly as they can. Like that baby can't even walk properly and they're still down to mess dad up haha
[Followup afterwards](https://youtu.be/PLMSoD1riE0)
In retrospect he handled it extremely well. Took a moment to apologize, kept his answer in mind, and then continued when the noise and disruption was removed. I've had similar situations happen during online job interviews and I've handled them much more poorly. 
I live under a rock...
I knew, but it was nice seeing this again. The door close at the end was great. 
I remembered this video but I forgot how glorious that strut was
Omg I forget this gem even existed. 10/10
You're a hero, I had no idea what it was about
You da real MVP.   :''' )
I definitely don't live under a rock and use Reddit multiple times a day, but I had completely forgotten about this guy/incident because it was from a year ago...
Thanks.  Had no idea what was going on.
Thank you, that was amusing!

It's a very nice rock thank you very much...
He doesn't get up to help because he's not wearing pants
Thanks. I had no idea what was going on in the OP post.
**#NANNYGATE**
I do. Thanks
Thank you.  It’s cozy here under the rock but sometimes you miss things.  I had to scroll way too long to find this, kind internet stranger. 
Thank you for that!
Oh my goodness, it's still absolutely hilarious!
Apparently i live under a rock ;(
Thanks, I couldn't see it for my rock.
Thanks for that. It never gets old. 
Tbh I remembered it as soon as I saw the original post, but I never would have otherwise. 
Finally! I had to scroll through about a thousands comments thinking what the hell is so funny about a pic of some guy sitting in his home in a suit.
Did you mean post-Soviet space? 
Thanks. 
Jesus that post was a year ago. I don't know anyone who knows of this. Living under a rock or living life outside of the internet? 
From the sounds I hear upstairs, I though I lived under some teenage elephants but now I know they're rocks. Thanks!
im on this site about 4 hours every day yet i still didn't see this
In the name of all the rock people: thank you.
Thank you! I was like I don’t understand why this picture won’t play the video...I had yet to see the video. Gave me a good laugh.
Dude, seriously. Thank you.
Thanks.  TIL I live under a rock.
Thanks. I don't get very good reception under here.
Thank you. TIL I live under a rock.
"If you live under a rock"

Links 1 year old post with 3k upvotes ಠ_ಠ
You live under a rock if you don’t remember something from over a year ago?
I've never watched the video before, I've only seen stills and read a million posts about how the mom came in the room and beat the shit out of the kids after the dad sent a flying elbow into his daughter's face.

Oh Reddit...
Race traitor 
I had no idea what you were talking about so I looked it up. Little typo in the shows title, Hybrid which made it hard to find, but no worries. It sounds cute!  

The Return of Superman: 
Celebrity dads are left to care of their kids alone for 48 hours without the help of anyone, while their wives leave the home to enjoy some relaxing time off. The wives are shown leaving the home before the 48 hours begins and coming back to greet their family once the 48 hours have ended. During the 48 hours the dads and children are either doing a task the wives have written out for the dads to complete or the dads exploring new activities with their kids. Occasionally celebrity friends of the dads will stop by to interact with the kids.

It's a Korean show, apparently. 
Fuck Sam Hammington. Literal piece of shit if you know much about him.
Thank god we wont see Sam Hammington again. That guy is cancer.
Why/Source? I did one whole Google search and couldn't find anything.
Why won't we see him again? And why is he cancer? Could you elaborate?
https://i.imgur.com/JBEUUXv.gifv
[Yay, I'm helping.](https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY)

I saw it happen live. Very sweet.
If I'm going on BBC news I'm definitely busting out the suit.
But is he wearing pants?
Or safely off visiting grandparents.
Deadpool? https://imgur.com/ZsflDCS
Glad I'm not the only one who thought that. 
https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY
He was on live TV and his children ran in... He tried to be professional about it but it was too much of a meme so people found it funny.
LOL, or lol, is an acronym for laugh(ing) out loud or lots of laughs, and a popular element of Internet slang. 
Same, no idea what this is.
Or, you know, the grocery store.
....is this a kimchi joke?
[Context.](https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY)
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9q32axztfXU
Yes
Yes
Yes
Yes
https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY
Last time his kid came in and bothered him lol. 
the guy's kid (toddler age) came bounding in during a video interview before. the video circulated Reddit for a bit
Guy giving an interview on TV, kids walked in and hilarity ensued. 

https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY
A year or so ago, he was being interviewed. The door behind him was closed but one of his children came in and started walking around. Suddenly a woman comes baseball sliding in to grab the child and she backs away quickly. Meanwhile he's pretty much unphased by it. The internet claimed the woman was a nanny because she was Asian or something but it turns out it was his wife or whatever. 
This is the guy who was doing an interview and his child burst in dancing, and his wife came flying in trying to stop her

Edit: a word 
Same here
Same guy during a previous news clip had his two children run in on him and his wife had to come running in and grab the children
Huh. Thanks.
What's his name?
Lol no idea. I recognized this post from the room, not the guy 
I've seen him in somewhere. Can't figure it where. (I don't watch TV)
Was that clip featured on Last Week Tonight with John Oliver?
I second that
Kind of like Cooper with Saul Goodman and the guy from Altered Carbon. 
No it's a picture referring to an older video 
More Jason Isaacs imo
Blood for the blood God!
Sieze the means of news production!
Lol this perfectly exemplifies reddit socialists. Parents suck kids rule!
I'm latino and I automatically assumed it was the maid, too. Although, I don't think it's a race thing more than it is a status thing. We assume he has a maid because he exhibits traits of success and high class.
i think it was because of how she slid along the floor and looked panicked to get the kids out, like there would be repercussions if she didn't

that's what made me think she was a nanny
I must admit I assumed she was a maid as well, but for me I think it was because of the way she acted. Looking back on it, it's silly, but my knee jerk thought was that a maid would probably try to downplay her presence trying to retrieve the kids (as she did in the video), while a wife would be more likely to just walk in and get the kids and walk out again.
> white people called her a maid

I thought nanny, but yeah, guilty as charged.
Lol I’ve noticed whenever there’s an interracial couple (besides white and black) most people assume they’re not a couple 
Ill admit I also thought his wife was a maid and im not even white.
that was so funny to me.

the way she handled that she had to be the mom, people say the darndest things.
Didn't you just assume they were white people?
Why would you assume just the white people would assume that?
Am black, thought she was a maid

Kinda racist of you to assume that, don’t you think?
lol. White people?
Did you just racist while calling others racist about a guy not being racist?
Have to make it a race thing?
“White people” We’re to blame again lads. 
I am going to assume you're white.
> white people

Why not just people? Or do you generally discriminate against people based upon skin color?
I’m glad to see you conducted a thorough scientific survey to determine that all white people made this assumption. 
Solid edit. 
>all the white people

😂


I'll bite, how do you know the comments on reddit were written strickly by white people? 
Stop being racist.
That's very specific
People thought she was the maid? I guess I don’t know enough really rich people cause I just automatically assumed wife.
You people are obsessed with race. It lives rent free in your damn minds. 
White people are LITERALLY HITLER
Pretty racist thing for you to say
Yeah...I heard those comments (which we have proven were made only by white people) landed her in the hospital. 
>all the white people

Ironic that your comment about implied racism would include that phrase.
Gotta love reddit, a clearly racist statement given 1000+ upvotes because it's not attacking a minority.
It's funny how racist your comment is while calling out racist behavior.
You don't have to be white to judge people based on their ethnicity. Surprised you didn't know that.
Stop being a nerdy douche bag.  It's because of how bad she panicked and dragged the kids out of the room.
White people are the minority where I live.  I’m white and thought she was the wife.  You have anger issues.
Wow poor woman what a huge injustice. Definitely just those awful white people though, beautiful racialized POC would never do such a thing.
As long as 

>you can dish em out, you gotta be able to take it too; if you can't take it, I suggest you go take shelter at a safe space.


is adhered to by **everyone** that's fine. The second there is a double standard, then you throw that sentiment out the window. U.S. minorities and U.S. white people alike.
Very random thing to point out and bring up but yes I’m sure she’s doing fine 
I didn’t think she was the maid/nanny, and assumed she was his wife. I’m not trying to pat myself on the back for this though; the reporter is white, and the children have Asian features, so it makes sense that the woman, who appears to be Asian, is his wife. It seems like a lot of people missed this???
It's funny how easily people are offended by a generalisation about 'white people' yet most of the time wouldn't say shit if it was against a minority. This comment is fair 
Agenda detected. Alphabet boy.
Congratulations! You're juat as racist for assuming only white people thought that! Funny how assuming like that works, isn't it! 
The edit that quadrupled the length of your comment is far more irritating than anything you have to say about white people
My mom was a maid and she thought the lady was a maid, my mom is Polish.  My wife is black and she for damn sure thought that was a maid and one that was possibly mistreated.  Same for myself.  Now here is my reason as to why I thought it, having watched shit like The Nanny and other shows like it, the cartoonish way she slides into the room and the look on her face is just like a scene would have been from one of those shows.  It literally looked like a scene where a nanny or maid lost the kids for a few seconds and they got into a bunch of trouble.
So many triggered snowflakes ignoring your edit
"Didn't do 'nuffin" +5653

"Religion of Peace amirte?" +2963

"I identify as attack helicopter XD" +9999

"White males are tone deaf and culturally insensitive" -8569548


-reddit.com
Shit, I didn’t even watch the video but I am white so you got me there! 
Only white people know what maids are.  TIL
Uhm... I've never heard or seen this. Any source on such comments?

Pretty obvious it's the mum, with the children and all. 

Also a little unnerving you automatically assume the race of the commenters you mention :/
Its just their racism showing. Just have to ignore it. North Americans believe the only people who can be racist are Caucasian 
Hi, this is untrue. Some people are racist and some are not.
I loooooove how you make a statement about people making generalizations, and you can't even finish the fucking sentence without doing the same thing yourself.
> Hi, are you feeling personally offended that this comment is getting upvoted? Comments making fun of minorities also get tons of upvote all the time, you might not have noticed it because you just chuckled and moved along. If you can dish em out, you gotta be able to take it too; if you can't take it, I suggest you go take shelter at a safe space.

Dam. Truth. Is all good to think she was a maid, and it is all good to mention what you did. 
I don’t think it was her race, it was that so looked so absolutely panic stricken, beyond what I would expect from his spouse. While I wasn’t sure either way I was debating whether she was wife, maid or nanny.
With that edit it sounds like YOU need a safe space lad. A white guy take your seat on the bus or something?
Not really no, comments about minority are deleted and users are banned, yours is « strangely » remaining up. 
The weird thing though is that the kids even have asian traits, so why on earth wouldn’t people connect that those are his children and his wife? they look noting like him and I don’t think most maids bring their kids to work.
>after all the white people

how do you know it was only white people?
As a white guy, I am totes offended at my race's stereotyping of other races.
Racist
Shut up shitskin
mom did act like a complete idiot though. 
I love you 
fuck off retard
I fucking love your edit holy shit
singles out a race… proceeds to call others racist 

project much?
This is completely normal though.

it is called the ["nature of prejudice"] (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9mGxJkFVQpI)
> If you can dish em out, you gotta be able to take it too

Whites can't apparently. That's why there are laws now, to prevent what they did from happening to them. 
Easy there, your prejudice is running away with you.
Down voted for the edit. Not the original post. 
SJW spotted! Jumping right to race. People thought she was a maid based off his status not skin colour.
Lol all these comments in the span of 10 minutes brigadier you with the same “why are you pinning this on white people?!?” ‘message, they’re like twitter bots except sadder cause they’re just coordinated humans
The only reason I thought she was a maid or a nanny was because I thought there was no way an Asian chick was going to go for that white nerdy dude.
The original comment was nice, thought out, and well stated!

 The edit however, makes you seem like you are angry at something or someone? You don't need to explain the reasoning behind why you get upvoted... we all know. You seem like an intelligent person, who also likes to just be a prick online that needs the approval of internet via upvotes.

Also opening an edit with "Hi, are you feeling personally offended?" Is one of the most cringe worthy statements I have read in a while.
Sorry, are you saying your racist comment is ok because some white people are racist?  
Lmao you really triggered all the white people
Great edit.
Upvoted for tv edit rather than the original statement. 
"white people" Holy shit are you for real
Everyone replying to this admitting that they also thought that at first, this comment isn’t immediately accusatory, and we aren’t in control of our implicit biases. Maybe think about why that was your first assumption (non-white people too). Implicit biases become problematic in two ways; when we act upon them, but sometimes when we ignore them as well. Reflection is the key to understanding and practicing intersectionality.
I always assumed it was the nanny.
Yup, it was only the white people that thought that. Also the kid was white as well iirc, making it even more probable that the woman wasn't the man's wife. Its ok to make assumptions.
Definitely wasn't just white people but point still stands.
That is just because no one likes minorities. Not even minorities. 
[removed]
You seem like a hoot. /s
>You seem like ~~a hoot~~ *an uneducated idiot.* ~~/s~~

FTFY
The kid wasn’t mixed tho 
It's hard to tell because she had glasses on, but she does look biracial. 
More like a bicentennial entity
What?! Have another look. Maybe take a look at the video where they interview the whole family. Those are some mixed kids. 
Well, *your* observations were wrong
Yes she was.  Are you stupid?
Asking the important questions here. 
Nah the kids a definite future Elliot roger type 
I dont think it looked bad at all. It was a hilarious unscripted moment in their life that they're going to look back on and laugh at. Moms over reaction was the cherry on top.
Thank God she did what she did. Possibly the funniest few minutes of internet material I've ever seen. My wife and I are in tears every time we see it. 
The mom was fine, she was just grabbing a kid from what was a big interview for the guy.  I mean, he's doing it from his home office obviously.  She just went and grabbed the kid.   It was a TV interview,  I doubt she had a lot of time to react. 
It was a very Korean reaction. He's an academic, which is a very prestigious career in Korea, and being on TV as an academic is the penultimate of prestige in Korea. To her, the kids ruining this was a social DEF CON 5.
5 is the safest, 1 is when shit hits the fan
The mom was fine. 
DEFCON 1 (most severe).  


DEFCON 5 (least severe)
The kid knows she/he is not allowed into that room. Turning it into something fun just reinforces their belief that its ok to  do things you were told was forbidden.


Same reason you should never laugh with kids that act funny at the dinner table. Even if they are hillarious. Just makes them think it's ok to break rules.
That's just a mom trying to hussle kids away from Dad while he's working, and Dad's work just happens to be *a live fucking interview on national news*, a little freak out is warranted.
I agree. She panicked and overreacted. The reason for this is likely because in Korean society, they take jobs very seriously, and there is always a pressure to look professional no matter what. 

Koreans dont know how to just relax when it comes to work. Its a nationwide problem, and a lot of young Koreans consider working abroad these days when they find out about Western work culture compared to their own. 
DEFCON 1
Defcon 5 good, progression to 1 is worse 
DEFCON 1is launch. DEFCON 2 great ready to launch. 
 Our stupid governments have tried to launch multiple times. Lone actors prevent this. We are lucky, not smart enough for these weapons. 
 
Was it the mom or nanny?
It was mom.  A lot of people made this same mistake . . . assuming he would be married to Caucasian.
My assumption comes from experience. I used to do a lot of radio from home. I'd tell my wife i'd be on the air from 5-6pm in my home office and all was good. Kids were quiet. I'd tell the nany the same thing when my wife was away and every damn time i'd hear the kids coming up the stairs 'Daddy?' It is just one of those things kids will gravitate to the parent for something not the nanny. So many times I had to explain live on air I was holding a 1 year old.
the mom
It was as if she was *deathly* terrified of the consequences. Abuse-like consequences. 
Do the Boston bombing next, detective 
Some people are just wound tight. I can see myself doing the same thing and I am not in any way in an abusive situation. 
The fact that you jumped to "he's abusing her" so quickly makes me just wonder... are you okay, man? 
What kind of ridiculous assumption is that?! 
Project much?
What am I missing here?
> his wife swooped in like a ninja

Yes, if by "swooped in like a ninja" you mean "slid in like Cosmo Kramer."
I don't understand why he didn't just turn, grabbed the kid and got her out of the room. There can only be one explanation - he wasn't wearing pants. 
Ootl plz hep 
No, his inability to react or smile about it shows that he couldn’t handle it. He could have picked up his girls and kept talking as if nothing happened.
It wasn't his wife. 
It was a helper. 
He is living in Asia and has a live in helper from Philippines that cooks for them cleans the house and takes care of the kids while him and his wife work. 
It's his wife and I think she is Korean actually, so just a few hundre miles of sea away from being right. There is another BBC video where she and the children take part in a funny interview. The original was an instant classic, so it got a follow up.
Yeah someone posted that clip. I was wrong. 
Honest mistake based on context. 
You grow up in a country where this is the normal way of life and that was my assumption. I actually find it fascinating seeing how myself and people I watched this with were so sure it was a maid and were like....oh damn she is in trouble. Where as people from the west saw it as the wife. 
Context. 
[No, it was his wife](https://youtu.be/PLMSoD1riE0) 
Oh interesting. 
He married his helper. 
Not uncommon. 
Genuine question: why do you think she was his helper first and then married her? 

He’s an expat living in Korea, and she is a Korean woman. 
Because I live in a country where lots of families have live in helpers who are either  Indo or Phillipine and it's the norm. It's affordable childcare and it allows most families here to get back to work very shortly after having kids because maternity leave isn't really a thing. 

The bit about marriage was a joke based on everyone's crazy reaction that I saw what I saw which was a frightened helper....so I out fuel on that fire as a joke I guess. 

It's not uncommon for people. Mostly expat. To hook up with their helper. Some are very attractive I guess and the men get confused seeing this young woman taking care of their kids all day. I have a friend who had to get rid of his helper for that exact reason. She would dress in short shorts and short tops and flirt with him and he couldn't handle it.  It's also not uncommon for teenage sons to hook up with the helpers. One instance had a family who's sons both contracted HIV from this because the helper was also moonlighting as a hooker on her day off. 

On Sundays most helpers get the day off. There are certain areas downtown where they all hang out and chat or eat or try to pick up Indian construction workers. 

A number of them will also bring a change of clothes. Slut up and head down to work the legal red light districts we have here....before returning home. Finding a dark corner of the condo gardens to change back into their shirts and t-shirt (standard maid gear) and coming to kiss your kids good night. 

It's a weird dark world but it's our childcare system for most well-off families. 
Hahahah. This comment was purely to wind those of you up. And it worked. Glorious. 
I don't know why you got down voted.. May be presumptuous about the Philippines part but very likely correct it was a maid. 
They appeared in interviews together, after the incident. It was his wife.

Edit: link - https://youtu.be/PLMSoD1riE0
Ok so I didn't know that. Let me guess it's racist or something to make that assumption  ? 
Primarily because you were speaking as if you know this for a fact, when you had pulled it out of your own racial stereotypes and biases. Secondly, because your probably just a troll.
I said very likely not definitely. And even corrected him on the presumption she's Philippino. It's great to try and dismiss what someone's saying simply by calling them a troll. I'm Vietnamese so you can take the white guilt bullshit and fuck off. 
No, you get downvoted because you are wrong
I made an assumption based on data... I did not continue to say yeah definitely a maid.. I did not have the information she was his wife... 
I mean, yeah, it is. Why would you assume she was a maid except that she’s Asian? 
Yes, because as I've said demographically Asian women dominate that industry. My mother was a maid. I'm Vietnamese. So don't try to give me I'm racist because I acknowledge factual disparities in the racial demographic in an industry. 
The children were obviously Asian. The woman with them was Asian. He was broadcasting from Korea. 

Yeah, it was a racist assumption. 
I apologize for the incorrect assumption

I can understand the belief that you find this racist but I think it's only found to be racist if you look down on maids. 
See my answer above, it's not a maid.
Yep. 
We get it. 
Honest mistake based on life context. 
Odd  people here think it's racism or something.
‘Based in life context’ is just a nicer way of saying ‘based on my preconceived stereotypes.’

It’s absolutely racist to assume she was the maid just cause she’s Korean. Even after being told she was his wife you still insisted that he married the hell, even though she’s not and never has been the help. That’s pretty racist, dude. Maybe just own your mistake and learn from it instead of being defensive?
Sure thing bud. 
How about I saw what I saw as did plenty of people who live in a place where it's fairly normal to have a live in maid from either Phillipines or Indonesia. 
The comment about marriage was a joke after I saw I was wrong just to aggravate all the people like you who get too angry about things. 
And no it's not racist. 
Try stepping out of your bubble. Travel. Spend time living in other cultures and see how other people with other circumstances to you see things. 
Have a pleasant day.
I lived in a China for a year, bud. I’ve traveled to plenty of places. You’re really good at assuming things about people without having the facts. 

What you assumed was a racist assumption. You clearly haven’t learned as much from your travels as you think, especially since you can’t even tell the difference between a person from Korea and a Filipino woman. 
I haven't traveled. 
I live in Asia. 
Don't assume things about me please. Racist pig. 
So you’re telling people to travel when you yourself haven’t? Okay. 

Seriously, dude, grow the fuck up.  
"Very likely" and the truth are two different things. Despite you're attempt at rational thought you are wrong. Hence you're being downvoted, so people don't waste their time looking at wrong assumptions.
Lol  I know. Im just staring a fact. 
I find it interesting that people from the west see this and think it's his wife. I saw this with people living in HK and we all saw a terrified helper trying not to lose her job. 

As someone that lived in SE Asia for a long period of time and saw  most families over there raised kids this way. Expat or not. 

Helpers were from Phillipines or Indo. Some had great lives. Others treated like garbage and lived in a cupboard.  Literally. 

People on Reddit downvote what they don't understand. 

This isn't South East Asia though. He lives in Korea (AKA East Asia) and the woman (his wife) is Korean. Maids are really uncommon in Korea with only the extremely wealthy having them and it is even less common to be married to your maid.
Yeah yeah my last comment was just a joke because everyone was so up in arms. 

I'm off to ask my maid to make my wife and kids breakfast now. 

Have a good day. 
And you are wrong indeed
Haha yea turns out I was. 
It is a basic statistic that the maid industry globally is dominated by Asian females. My mother was one. There's nothing wrong with it. I live in the UAE and the maids here are treated like shit. It's an ugly truth enabled by global economics and politics 
Nope nothing wrong with it. Just needs better regulation perhaps. 
Some people treat their maids like family. I have a friends who moved to Canada and worked really hard to bring the maid with them. She chills and watches TV with them in the evenings and takes care of house and kids during the day while they work. 
Others treated them like garbage and are subjected to poor conditions and abuse. It's sad. 
Lots of these women or girls have their own families back home as well. Almost all their money Is sent home to take care of their family. 
Many of the younger girls have been sent there by their own families to earn a better living to support their family back home.
We had a cleaner come in two times a week for a couple of hours. Then all of a sudden she vanished. She got in touch with us one day to say if the police asked about her we didn't know her. A month later she messaged us saying she had been deported back from Phillipines for working illegally :(
Also. One other thing is that the local Asian families tend to not want maids who have worked with western families as they feel that they have been 'spoiled'. Odd thing we were told when looking around for some help via agencies one time. 
Ultimately the issue with abuse of foreign workers is the issue. It is not confined to certain industries it is a problem with the countries it occurs in. This is the case in the UAE. 
Or a mime artist. Or even better, two mime artists.
Reasonably. 
Maybe.

...

Possibly. 
Huh. I thought I had read somewhere that he had admitted to not wearing pants. My bad. ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯
Nah, that wouldn't happen. It's a TV studio, they'd used gaff tape. 
This breaks my heart just a little more every time someone mentions it. 
And the beating of their hearts.
He was able to make a whole lot more money doing interviews and consulting gigs thanks to the fame brought to him by that last interview
Can confirm. I'm a white dude. Have a Korean wife. But I'm also the maid. 
So many soldiers come back from Korea with wives. 
Then again also would not be weird to have a korean maid.
The assumption was never that it was weird, just not typical. In another country it would probably be a good guess that it was his maid, but not in Korea when he has Korean children.
Well, stupid takes practice. This is like the dojo.
TBF, I didn't know this video took place in South Korea until about 20 minutes ago.
To be fair, although my first thought when I saw the wife run in was 'good for him, I guess' since she's attractive and looks a fair bit younger than him, and not 'must be the maid', until the second interview I couldn't really tell what blend of ethnicity the children were.  I'll be honest. the first kid's strut was what I focused on.

To add...In the American Midwest, 'good for him/her/you' means entirely different things depending on the tone it's said with. 
I have to admit my first thought was that she was the nanny, I think it was a mixture of her more casual clothing compared to his suit and her reaction to the kid. The way she slunk into the room instead of just walking in and grabbing the kid just screamed "oh shit my boss is gonna kill me" to me 
People who have never traveled or lived near people of any other culture tend to lack cultural awareness. So they think that white people date white people, black people date black people, etc.

It's not an excuse. It's just the reason why these people are stupid. 
Well, to be fair, i would say that a large porcent of the people that watched it, dont even know who the guy is nor what the interview was about, and what is so "obviously" asian about the kids?  
>The Reddit userbase just gets dumber and dumber.

You're the exception though. You're really smart.
I didn't find the kid blatantly asain.  Some kids haven't grown into their faces yet and they're all meshed up looking.  It's not like a black kid whose skin color is vastly different
Maybe redditors aren't  dumb but the medias  caused this misconception.  I just did a quick research on google about the articles talking about this. 7/10 refered to her as "the woman", 1/10 called her as "the rescue", 1/10 refered to her "probably the mother or the nanny" and 1/10 actually said she was Mrs Kelly mentioning her name. So not really a question of stupidity or ignorance but poor reporting. Maybe they weren't  clear on that point due to her poor judgement in solving the situation. This too might have influenced people to make them think that she isn't  the wife. I am a woman myself, not being judgamental, it was hilarious to watch, but she should've  known better.  IMO there was nothing wrong with the kids entering the room, it can happen. She could've  just walked in and picked them up and nothing would've  happend. He could've  picked the girl and sit her on his lap and still everything ok. But nah both parents lost it apparently. Hence it can happen, kids make our life a  beautiful mess sometimes :).


I mean, the kids looked Asian, so it's obvious that his wife is Asian. I think people thought it was a maid because he looks like a well-off guy and she had a very "he's gonna beat me with a rubber hose and fire me" way of handling the situation, and the way that he refused to acknowledge her. 

Just didn't seem how a married couple usually acts, but he was probably just nervous and didn't know how to react.
I can’t believe I had to scroll this far down in the comments before I found this. 
I think they thought she was his maid because the guy is a 9/10 and his wife is a 2/10, roughly speaking. It has nothing to do with her being Asian. Sorry if that is too blunt. 
Where did that come from
What the hell is wrong with you?
I can vouch for OP, I remember people talking about her being a maid when the video first came out. I think my mom was one of them. 
She came  barreling in there making more noise than the kids, its killing me
She's trying to get her pants up at the same time, you just know she took her eyes off those two rascals for 10seconds to have a pee and barely finished before she heard the sound of disaster from down the hall. 
https://twitter.com/bigsportgb/status/841929475755409408?lang=en 

this it?
I can't find it but the one with Grayson Allen and Coach K is also hilarious. The facial expressions are on point
Lol now that you mentioned it, it does look like his walk.
Ok get this for further comedy. It appears the wife's pants are halfway down if you watch closely...

The consensus on the original thread was that she was probably in the bathroom at the time, which is how the kids were able to wander away from her initially lol. 
Yeesh those kids are lively lol
Hot damn those kids are non-stop.
This is what I came for. The poor wife. She even tried to offer proof that the dad wasn’t in pajamas, “There’s a photo of us from the same morning in regular clothes.” Pops pats her leg, as if to remind her that they aren’t on trial.
IMO, they milked it so much. A two minute interview would've been great but they had to drag it on for nearly 10 minutes lol. Then again, it's nice to hear their side of the story too. Lovely couple!
Aww that's so sweet, the wife's thought that she would rather people not argue so much about if she is the wife/nanny but rather just enjoy the video 💛 what a beautiful family 💛
Once, after a 10 minute of continuous barking (which happens NEVER) I straight up got up from my chair and yelled at my dog like a crazy person. At that point I literally couldn't take it anymore. 
Hi Patrick.
A Detroit-Rock....City?
You're not alone.
Had to go looking for a clip/source. Cute show!
https://youtu.be/hdP8FPiEfnc
It's called "Superman" because it's amazing when a father in Korea actually does any housework. 
Ah yes, it's been a real long time since I watched that show so... but good sleuthing!
I actually love that show I’ve almost watched every episode of it since it came out. I thought the earlier seasons were the best. It gets a bit boring now but really brightens up your day sometimes. 
Yessss! That’s the one! 
I've done friends who have done Skype interviews with Australian hospitals in the middle of the night & kept their PJ bottoms on! 
Yeah. If you look at it with a little squint you can see it. 
Good lookin out 👍🏾
I LOLed at this.
https://youtu.be/Mh4f9AYRCZY
Why would he bury them under a grocery store?
Thank you.
Ah. Glad to see he didn't get fired for that. And is doing good.

And he either is confident they won't come in, or has given up trying. 
He married Rambolina.

She's in and out before you even know she was there.
And his what?
Whoops. Wife. 
Jason Isaacs in the near future, or maybe his younger brother. 

He’ll be Gandalf in his later years. 
This escalated fast
Milk for the Khorne Flakes!
[Sacrifice to the Slaughtergod!](https://youtu.be/pQcUrj-AXJM)
Thrones for the throne skull!
WAAAGH
Skulls for the Skull Throne!
Skulls for the skull throne!
#Hood's balls, Fid - you can't say that around the Adjunct!
TODAY IS A GOOD DAY TO DIE!  VALLHALLA!
Milk for the corn flakes!
You have nothing to lose but your diapers!
Seize the means of reproduction!
He lives in Korea. Korea's not the kind of country where you can easily own a maid, you still need to be pretty well-off to do that here.

And hiring a regular cleaning service (which is kinda cheap) =/= having a maid.

e: While I understand why the wording is triggering some people, I think it takes a modicum of common sense to realize I don't actually advocate for or think that maids are property.

e2: apparently explaining to people who didn't know he lived in Korea, that he lives in Korea, is really rude.
That's ridiculous. If it had been a white woman, you (or I) wouldn't have thought that. It's unpleasant, but at least be honest with yourself.
>  don't think it's a race thing more than it is a status thing

These two things are inseparable. The assumption simply wouldn’t have been made if her husband wasn’t white or if she was white. 
 He just married his maid so things wouldn't seem complicated. 
Would you have thought she was maid if it was a white woman who walked in?
"I'm a minority so I can't be racist." 
Eh I'm also latino and maid didnt even come to mind, her being his partner is what I automatically assumed.
What traits makes him seem high class? The suit? It's a pretty basic suit you could get for cheap.
Excellent example of why you shouldn't make assumptions about people you don't know.
Yeah I mean this guy's downvotes are partially coming from him complaining about assuming race, then assuming the race of the people that upvoted
Damn people really don’t know what a half asian kid looks like
Never really noticed until someone pointed it out. Guess I was too busy laughing. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Implicit_stereotype
His kids were Asian, was obviously the mom.
That just means you automatically assumed the darker skinned person did not exhibit traits of wealth or success. Which is silly, she enjoys the same lifestyle as her husband more than likely. 


I'm Asian and I thought she was a maid
being latino (or any other “non-white” ethnicity) does not exclude one from being racist or prejudice, just makes the behavior ironic.
I thought it was a maid as well but that's probably because I'm from HK where Filipino maids are extremely prevalent. My family is not wealthy but we still had them.
In my country maids are also extremely prevalent. And it isn't even exclusive to high class families. Even middle class families like mine can afford to pay a maid to come clean and maybe even take care of the kids twice a week.
You people also expect a latino to be a maid because of the lack of education in immigrants. I'm saying you people because we don't have latino immigrants or maids in my country.
and while he is in suit she was in plain clothes, the contrast lead to the conclusion, not the race.
For me it was the degree of panic that made me wonder.
Because mothers wear suits when they are looking after their kids?
It doesn't have to make sense it's your gut instinct, my first reaction was a maid because of the difference in dress (Although I still don't believe he was wearing trousers).

Then I thought about it and actually, that doesn't disqualify her from being the mother, that's why it's called a second thought.
Most relationships take place in the same socioeconomic class, if you see a 30 second clip with people signalling different classes most won't automatically assume they are married. 
Everyone has to make it a race thing. 😔
Well the repercussions will be her husband's work opportunity will be compromised, probably just means they're a team
Maybe she's just smart enough to understand how serious work calls are? This is how my mom would have acted with us.  Really weird that you say that makes her seem like a nanny though..
I thought nanny too. 
Agreed. I didn't even notice she was Asian.
Yes, repercussions being fucking up her husband important gig. He was doing a bit for BBC for fuck's sake. It's pathetic how high your comment is upvoted. 
Lmao that is not why you thought she was a nanny.
Exactly this. My first assumption was a cleaning lady just because of the urgency to fix the situation.
Yeah, that's what my husband thought. The panic in her eyes screamed "nanny" more than "mommy". 
Nah it just means you're racist if you have that line of thinking, if some of the replies to me are to be taken seriously. 
Thaaank you. 
I'm pretty sure she was trying to use the bathroom and that's how to kids got away from her. Mommy is just trying to take a second for herself and the kids immediately get into mischief. If you watch the original clip, her pants are like halfway down and that explains what she stays bent over the whole time, she's not trying to expose herself on live TV. 
That's messed up poor woman. Kids can be a hassle. But that's hard to spot on first viewing.
The one trait Nannies are famous for! 
>while a wife would be more likely to just walk in and get the kids and walk out again. 

Mom doesn't play.  ;)


Would you have thought she was a maid if she was white? 
Why would a wife not try to downplay her presence when her husband is on live television? 
No, you totally assumed that only because you're white. Didn't you read what they said??  /s
> guilty as charged.

Don't you dare write a song during our argument!
Happens to me and my spouse a lot. And when we display closeness implying relationships, it becomes -really- easy to weed out the assholes based on facial expression alone. Racist fucks, acting like white people have it SOOOOO BAD and then shitting on everyone else. 
Yep.  They always try to separate us in line.  Airport security tries to make us go separate etc...
Or they think you are driving an uber.
Thinly-veiled racism.
Because he/she is the actual racist.
Welcome to the far left.  Where everyone's a racist and logical applications of the term go out the window.

This would be a great "Whose line is it" meme.
Tsk. It's not racist to write "white people."

Since when is it racist to say white people, black people, brown people, so on. It's not, get off your imaginary high horse.
/u/QuesadillaJ didn't mean that the use of the term "white  people" was racist.  they meant that assuming the people who made the mistake were "white people" was racist.
Yes, it's racist to assume that the demographic with a long and storied, factual history in racism and inequality was doing that again. 
I mean yeah.  Assuming behaviors of individual people based on their race is pretty clear cut racist.  Also attributing actions taken by an people at large to a specific race would also be viewed as pretty racist.
So every race then lol
> Did you just racist


❄️ 
This comment is beautiful. 
 The people who thought she was a maid because of her skin color made it a race thing. 
Always.
Yes, this internet person calling out white people has really impacted my life personally. I am so hurt. 
Because the comment is designed to farm outrage and karma. That's why you get "all you white people". There's no point in getting mad, just enjoy the fact the person posting it really hates themselves and the life they lead.


What do you mean "you people"?
I know right. Some people *literally* have to live with other’s prejudices in their skin and on their face. 
It's funny how you americans use the word race so much. In my langage/country it's used for animals and thats it. Human is a race. Slav (for eg) is an ethnic group. 
In science, they're are other "races." The humans species is comprised of dozens of subspecies all with adaptations to fit their environment. Pretending were not different in ways that we would classify animals isn't right in anyway, and if anything makes it harder to spread racism. Accept that those differences exist, but it doesn't make anyone better or worse for them.
That's not true at all. Race is not a scientific term, and people of different races are not different subspecies that's insane.
K
Not as bad as being HITERALLY LITLER.
http://i.imgur.com/mCREVyw.gifv
I'm not even convinced it was an "over-reaction", although it was dramatic. As you say - it was unscripted, but it wouldn't have been better if it were: her natural reaction was used as a gimmick in probably the most successful US sitcom of all time (the Kramer slide she did) and her closing the door in a 'subtle' crawl really finished it in a beautiful way.

It was a video that was a perfect storm of entertaining factors, but to me, the mother was the star of the show.
Maybe bad is not the right word. Embarrassing I guess?
I showed this to my korean parents, they DIED
Lol she almost fell over trying to do it. It was definitely frantic.
Defcon 1
What is the ultimate of prestige in Korea?
Just so you know penultimate means second to last.
Haha interesting
So my life is at DEFCON 1.  Got it.
1 is when there is no more fan and the shit is the only thing left.
I learned this from r/mma of all places. We hit goofcon 1 earlier this month. 
They really fucked that one up didn't they. Virtually every other numbering system gets more extreme as it goes up not down.
I assume we've only been at 1 twice in the last 100 years
Every single time. This needs to be said every single time. 
This is what I failed to do in my first year of teaching. My students would make wildly inappropriate jokes and I'd laugh. Then I'd say that's inappropriate and not to disrupt class again. Of course they'd do it again and I'd have the same reaction. I had to really perfect my stony glare after that. 
Is it really against the rules to be funny at the dinner table over at your place?
One and the same
That is exactly what I meant. LOL
Parent here, I bet it was a mix of "this can't be happening" and "pretend it isn't happening and carry on" combined with a healthy dose of mortification paralysis.
Agreed
[Here you are friendo.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mh4f9AYRCZY)
You didn't have me with one, but two i'm sold
Even better than that: a meme artist!
It's called miming and it's art.
This is getting out of hand. Now there are two of them. 
He said he wears jeans for these since nobody sees below the desk. 
There actually was a follow-up interview with the whole family, and yes, he said he was wearing pants:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PLMSoD1riE0
It’s not a studio, it’s this guy’s house.  He does these analyses from his home office via Skype.  If he’s any kind of a homeowner at all, he’ll have duct tape.  So.  Much.  Duct. Tape.
TIL that duct tape and gaffer tape are not two different words for the same thing.
Did you even watch the original clip??
Poe?
[Oh indeed](https://media0.giphy.com/media/BlVVi6LGpZZ7O/source.gif)
Lol, same
The military really needs to advertise this fringe benefit more
Nobody knows, but the war is still going on.
I know. But I'm saying that it's not weird to have a Korean wife but the first thing that came to people's mind was that it's his maid. That's the difference.
It would not be weird to have both Korean wife and Korean maid. He is living in Korea, and it's logical to have Korean maid.
Rex Kwondo Dojo
Oohh!

Nice one! 
That's what I was thinking lol. All these experts on South Korean bedroom design.
> In the American Midwest

I didn’t know this was a uniquely Midwestern thing. Although, I grew up in northern Illinois/Wisconsin, so maybe that’s why.
Slunk?

She literally slid through that door like Tom Cruise home alone. 
A wife has to dress up everytime the husband wears a suit? 

You have strange preconceptions. 
I thought she was the mom at first, but the frantic scramble to grab the kids made me wonder if she was the maid, like a woman afraid of losing her job. I looked it up after watching the video. 
That's an Asian thing. Your wife is your everything. Including your maid.
Is it really stupidity? A lot of people thought she was a nanny/maid because of the situation and attire not just their races. 
Because race mixing is actually very rare? 
"Race mixing" is definitely not rare. Maybe in the place where you live, which was exactly what my comment was talking about. 
Thanks for that, was well worth it.
Omg lol
Oh, god, it synchs so well
Too good. 
That shit is better every loop
I'm walking on a treadmill at the gym and I can't stop laughing out loud at this. Best thing I've seen all day
That's the one. It's awesome
I think that's an undershirt, same color at the collar. 
"I'm sorry... everything is not normal with the kids... even right now."
Most kids are.
Hey I used to work at a huge dog centre and we weren't allowed to let the dogs bark really - like a single play baark or bark of surprise is fine but otherwise, no barking even during tour hours. The dog were loose and wed like anywhere between 50-150 big and small dogs. 


So if it helps, going to your dog (provided your dog is comfortable being handled and is not a crazy stressful situation and, you know, generally isn't bitey), try placing your hand softly around the muzzle and just squeezing for a brief second with a "No". I've seen dogs do this to each other with mouths.


Be very consistent. EVERY TIME dog barks, you're there saying no and a little squeeze.

Also: put a martingale collar and leash on your dog in house. Gentle correction. But you have to consistent and fast. The longer you wait to correct dogs, the harder for them it is to understand. 
NO THIS IS THE KRUSTY KRAB!!!
I didn't think I would watch all of that. It was so endearing and entertaining.
Love is an open dooooorrrrr
Because they rarely tear them down. Another grocery store will just replace it in 20 years. 
Or they decided they go out when he does interviews lol
is there a middle ground between those two that we feel comfortable with?
Khornites aren't exactly known for subtlety.
That escalated quickly

FTFY
~~God~~ damn it..

Edit: I dont know about any religious cults
Good song choice!
Might not want to say "own a maid". 
Yea but I dont think even 20% of the people who called her a maid knew he lived in Korea. 
Yes, but in the US it is very common to call a cleaning service a maid service. And to call a cleaner who is only there for a couple hours every other week "the maid."

Not universal, but definitely common. 
Can you believe these people aren’t familiar with the socioeconomic trends regarding Korean home-services? 
I did not know that. Nor do I know who he is, in reality. I think that's the case for the grand majority of people who watched this video.

Or I'm just an idiot. That's probably it. 
Do you think everyone who watched that 20 second clip knew he lived in Korea or something?
It's always been like $80-$100 for a full-house cleaning in my city, which is definitely not cheap to me haha. But I'm also poor, so there's that...
While I don't give a shit either way. ~~This was broadcast in the US~~. Having a maid is not uncommon and it's not prohibitively expensive. I could see how people maybe assumed it was his maid.

But who cares. Guys I think she's gonna pull through. 

Edit: I was referring to having someone come to your house and clean your shit occasionally. Not a live in maid. Obviously if you have a live in maid its going to be crazy expensive. 
You should stop making shit up. House cleaning services are hugely popular. 
It's tricky to 'own' a maid in many countries these days. 
Oh well because we all totally had the Korea context! /s
>And hiring a regular cleaning service (which is kinda cheap) =/= having a maid.

Except that in a terminology sense that is how most people will refer to that job.

Definition wise, it's just a female domestic worker. Have a female who comes in and washes your clothes once a week. You have a maid.

In part because that's what the cleaning lady used to be anyway, and because it sounds a little higher class than "The cleaning lady"

However I am sure there are some who would prefer to be called "the cleaning lady" because it is less suggestive of servitude.
What's strange is, I've got some friends from South America who didn't grow up any more than middle class and they had live in maids.
Also the little girl clearly looked like she was half Korean. 
I think you rent a maid, you don't own them.  Those days are over.
They don't use babysitters/nannies?  
A lot of single/widowed mothers do housework like a maid in korea. Most aren't live-ins but there are some. My moms family in korea is middle class at best and have a lady come by every 3-4 days to work. At one point we had an older woman/gma who has a live in. I think becuaae she had no family left and worked for living compensation.
> own a maid

Eh, We don't do that anymore...
I get what you're saying but I doubt even 10% of the people who saw the original clip knew he lives in Korea
I'm assuming the guy that's an expat in Korea and is asked to comment on global news is "pretty well off"
source? 
I agree with your comment, but a lot of people who watched this either didn't know he was in Korea, or don't know that maids aren't easily affordable there.

Also, I could see him being able to afford a nanny.
Upvote for use of “modicum”. The rest is just internet rhetoric. 
Nobody owns maids. You pay them for a service and everybody agrees on it. 
It's a little tough to own a maid in a lot if the world.

e: then change the wording of your post you nitwit. 
Most people never ever own a maid.  However lots of people hire maids, the maids do not live at these people's houses and only come once a week or bi-weekly, maybe even monthly. 

But you're right, having a live-in maid is very expensive and most people do not have one. 
Bro, you own slaves, not maids. You hire maids. 
Are you imposing your morals on someone else?  ;)
Nah, just saying when you own the maid, it’s a slave
Ok, just checking.  Cause I am using Game of Thrones is a reference and freeing slaves didn't always work out to well there.
You don’t ever own maids. This isn’t 1800. 
There's more slaves today than in the 1800s.
By volume sure but percentage wise?
That’s right. You just sponsor their presence in your country, without which they will be expelled.
Yes, because people make sure to study the socio-economic conditions of Korean maids before they make an assumption from a 1 minute video. /S
A lot of people are doubling down on the "well I didn't mean a full-time maid I meant a cleaning service" thing. That argument doesn't really jive with what happened in the original video - would a 2x / week / paid hourly maid care about the kid/work of the father etc as much as the woman in the video does?
Nope, and nor would the father schedule a cleaning service to come during his scheduled interview...
Lots of Koreans have maids. Never heard of Indonesians and Filipinos? 
Most Koreans do not have maids. 96% of Korea's populations are Koreans. 

0.002% of Korea's population are Indonesian or Filipino. 

A large amount of Korea's Filipino population are women who migrated to rural areas as brides, since rural areas are experiencing constant population drains to urban centers. 

Migrant workers make up less than 3% of the population. It is physically impossible for the vast majority of Koreans to have a migrant maid.

Only upper middle class and above have maids. 

And to reiterate, maids are not cleaners. Maids by definition are employees to perform a wide array of domestic duties.
Nice stats. Where did you pluck them from? Your arse?
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Demographics_of_South_Korea
You can't just poo poo us because you said something retarded. There's an edit button. Own your shit.

Edit: OWN YOUR SHIT!
My first thought when I saw this was, "Yeah he seems like the kind of guy who has a maid." I guess that subconsciously it was because she was asian.
The odds of a white maid of an American expat in a South Korea are low. The odds of a local maid to an American expat family are high. I personally didn’t make any assumptions either way, but it’s very clear why it’s unlikely for a white woman to be the maid of an American expat in South Korea. 
I don't think that's the case though.

I actually think the thing that suggested maid more than anything else was the fact that she ninja slid into the room in a panic.

It made it look like she was in a position to get into trouble for what had happened.

---

I'm not someone who is going to be on the news in an interview anytime soon. But I wouldn't expect my partner would be that stressed to do something like that, far more likely they would just walk in pick the kid up and walk out.
Being interviewed on TV in a suit.
Older white man wearing a suit living abroad in a house with a spacious office and being a corespondent to the BBC. 
Also the suit fits him well and we don't all know suit quality just by looking at one. 
Hey now.. If you don't assume the worst, you're not one of us!
r/relationships
As it was, it improved his profile! So pleased for them - as a dad with two little ones running around it's stressful enough without the eyes of the world on me
There's a followup to the story. After the husband ended the interview he and his wife had a talk like "that's it, we are screwed, we are never gonna get another interview"
yeah on second viewing that was quite obvious but not on the first one

plus you just kind of expect important business people doing news correspondence have nannies
“Team”....I like that. Puts it in a new perspective. 
I thought he was working for exposure?  
Not a simple work call, live commentary for a BBC. 
different family, my mum would have just let the kids do what they wanted and yelled at my dad for not closing the door
Her sliding on the floor (besides his asian looking kid) was exactly the moment I knew when she was the mom... What maid gets paid that much to have a life or death moment like that
But you're NOT racist? Sure, sure. 
Racism is, in a way, built into our society. A lot of people don’t intend to be racist but accidentally do racist things. It’s cause of stereotypes we get from tv, the media, etc.
That doesn’t mean it’s okay to just go with it and not question your judgements, no matter where you obtained them from.
No, of course not. But in my book, it’s the people who realize it and do something about it that are good people, and those who realize it yet choose to do nothing who are bad.
Thats a nice arguement :)
Found the downvote troll.
If anything, it was sexist. Her race didn’t matter, she was a woman looking after children. If anything the first thought I had was nanny because women are typically nannies. And I am also a woman and was a nanny.
It's pathetic how you seem to think you're superior to other people because you didn't think she was a nanny
It was so get bent
I recognised my own panic in her dash to get them out but someone else pointed out to me that her clothes were askew as if she'd been trying to go the bathroom, took her eyes of her kids for 1 second and they ran in to see what dad was doing

not easy to spot though
(◕‿-)

#(◕‿-)
what about my dreams dewey?! 
Give up on your dreams, Dewey! You'll never make it!
Then let's duet
We need more blankets and less blackets!
Don't you dare write song right now Dewey Cox! 
Did you just try and rap on me?
Aw, Sorry to hear that happens :( 
Or they assume you’ll have separate bills or let you know that the hotel room has two separate beds 😑
Oof that’s pretty bad :(
Well it’s fine if all they do is think. Worse when they are yelling at you because Uber is not allowed in that area. First response is confusion. Next is anger.
wow dude you really redpilled this comment section.
Not trying to be a nitpicker here...but using the literal application of the term isn’t the same as using the logical application of the term. 

As terms with a sociology root, they’re supposed to be applied in the way who created them used it.

Would you call someone who’s optimist about the world a positivist simply because it’s “logical”? lol


>Not trying to be a nitpicker here

Oh, weird because that's exactly what you are doing, aside from explaining yourself in a disjointed and incoherent manner.

But since you are in the business of picking nits, maybe you can report back to us with information on the individual who created the term "racist" and how *he/she* used it so we can make everyone happy...
See, there’s no issue with not knowing something. Being lazy and overly defensive about is where lies the issue. 

But suit yourself buddy, keep making a fool of yourself talking about things you don’t a have a clue about. lol 
To be fair, you didn’t really prove that you knew what you were talking about either...
Fair enough. Google is always there for someone to shut me down in my attempt to sound smart. 

Some expressions have a meaning that goes beyond their ethymology. Stripping them of their actual meaning because they have any given combination of words and affixes isn’t correct. 

I don’t think I need many credentials to be able to affirm it. 
Agreed. Completely agree with your point tbh, just not how you were presenting it.
And it wasn't just white people. It was more of a common behavior of affluent people that lead to that assumption. That's not wrong, that's just making assumptions based on our experience of certain people, in this case rich white people tend to marry white people.
What do YOU mean “you people”?
[This one is pretty good too](https://media1.tenor.com/images/19b622caee34acd7c47b8c005a39dcf0/tenor.gif?itemid=8006473)
after months I finally found it
That’s so good 
f
I'm sorry for your loss.
And when did people start thinking DEFCON was two words? Go rewatch WarGames ya noobs.
Being the TV showing off the academics. 
Being a Starcraft pro, of course.
...Are you pooping on fans?
So your life is world-ending nuclear war?
This is more accurate 
It stands for Defense Condition. Don't want to be on your fifth line of defense if shit goes down.
Been to 2 twice, Cuban missile crisis and gulf war. 9/11 was only a 3 believe it or not. 1 is pretty much "we're gonna launch the nukes as soon as this is done airing.
So a Red Dawn scenario would be DEFCON 1
Right, what's wrong with that? 
I'll start pointing out this goes for young kids. ages 3-10.


It's ok for kids to be funny as long as it doesn't disrupt others
. But you shouldn't laugh with kids when they are silly or (and especially this) try to act funny. Because they don't really know when it's time to stop. They don't know when something stops being funny. If you encourage them being silly and acting funny as an adult. They'll keep doing it until its no longer fun. You get mad. And they get confused. Because first you laughed. so that means you liked it.


It might be fine and easy to controll at home. But that act of trying to be funny at the dinner table is incredibly disruptive to the other kids trying to eat at school. Because there they get encouraged by the other kids almost instantly. and the behavior might spread to other kids if you do not shut it down asap. And you do not want to deal with 30+ kids acting like monkeys at the dinner table... No sir. 


I shut that shit down real fast if someone is out of line. They get 2 warnings and then they're out.
 Take him outside and let him stay there until everyone else (at his table) has finished. After that. I'll take him inside again. He can finish his food and we talk about why I did what I did and how one should conduct themself at a dinner table.
I can respect that this is how strictly you like to run your house, and maybe I've just been around more chill/reserved kids, but I'd say once they get to certain age it's ok to laugh at first and then make it clear that, while it was funny at first, it isn't anymore and to please stop. It sucks for them the first few times to hit that boundary but it helps them learn a social understanding of when to stop joking around, which I think is really important. 

I get what you mean though - the 30th iteration of the same joke in a row can make you wanna tear your hair out and not reinforce any humor ever. Definitely depends on the kid.
Tanks friendo, much lolz!


And they are fighting each other with absolutely perfect miming skills. Like I'm talking throwing each other through invisible tables, smashing invisible bottles over their heads, invisible swords, etc.
Two mimes at the same time man!
Hey VSauce!
Michael here
Ah, maybe that's what I saw. Thanks for chiming in!
Gaff tape is also handy for different applications. At Christmas we put a garland with lights on a stair railing and have to run an extension cord under the lip of the step.  Duct tape will leave sticky residue on the wood, gaff tape won’t as it’s designed to be used for things like securing cords to a stage for a single performance. 
Yeah, if you mix those up, you're gonna have sticky gunk on your lighting for the next 18 months.
That's quite the gaff! 
Gaff tape is what duct tape would be if duct tape didn't skip leg day.
I think you mean Risky Business
That's a weird takeaway. It's all about perception at a glance. Generally couples in social settings are identifiable by certain factors, one of those is that they tend to dress in a similar manner.

I work in retail and that's one of the many clues I use to gauge if people are together. If you've got a man in business casual and a woman in sweats, or vice versa, it's a safe assumption that they are not together.

Now this situation is a bit different, because it's not a social setting, they are in their home. However it feels like a social setting to the outside observer.
If you see an adult man and woman, and a bunch of kids, and your first thought *isn't* a family, then yes, there are some underlying racial prejudices or misconceptions that the person has, such as similar races sticking together and not dating other races. Without a doubt. Whether the person is racist or not is a different question altogether, but the fact that they think of families as a single race is in their mind if thats the case.

So yes, it is stupidity and a lack of open-mindedness. If you see a grown man and woman with a bunch of kids and your first thought is a nanny or maid, thats not normal. If the mother was white, nobody would have guessed nanny or maid. Lets not kid ourselves here. 
Man that's so extreme to me. You make grandiose statements like because seeing 2 kids a man and a woman and you're not immediately thinking they're a family then you're subconsciously prejudice. Could it not be due to circumstance, ignorance and chance? Most people are married within the same race and there are many countries that have maids so people make assumptions.
 
Most people who see this don't know he is living in South Korea and all the other little details. Also personally, him wearing a suit and his wife's overblown reaction to the whole situation is what made me think she may be a maid and that's my point. It doesn't always come down to race as the reason, and i don't think race was the reason for most watching the video and assuming she was a maid.
Okay, youre right. Everything I said was wrong. You win the internet argument! Yay! 
Relax mate, were just having a discussion. Have a nice day.
I'm relaxed. I just had an epiphany of how typing comments makes no difference in the end. Everyone thinks their own way, so what's the point, right? 
If it was a white woman who acted like that I would have assumed she was a nanny as well. Though I would have also assumed she was an Au Pair on assignment from Europe (if he's American).
/r/bettereveryloop, you say?
It is.
How could you stand that incessant background music... It was louder than the actual dialogue.
Have you got a photo wall and lots of red string?
Blood for the proletariat?
Power to the blood god ?
Milk for the Khorne Flakes
Proletariat for the blood power
Milk for the Khorne flakes?
An enthusiastic lot for sure
Just be angry my child, just be really fucking angry
Own a share in a maid providing service.
Well not anymore
I mean, it's still technically correct. Probably.
You don't own me! 
"Domestic pimping".
That's why he can't afford one. 
My maid!
I'm cracking up at all of the non\-PC comments calling everyone else out for not being PC. It's reddit. Nothing you say matters.
You don't know me,  I said what I meant and I meant what I said. 

Own. A. Maid.
Appropriate username 
He's also not the original person. Such a reddit moment.
Might not want to be offended by misinterpreting context of a matter so unimportant. 
I am offended that there are no butlers to be owned.  I am pretty sure this is a case of clear cut sexism.
Hey if we did a kickstarter maybe we could buy Gerard?
Ooohh.  He's the best Butler.  And he may come cheap since I haven't seen him doing much lately.  


Which is why I'm explaining that he lives in Korea.
The service is after all called Merry Maids.
True, my cleaning lady is just my cleaning lady, but i wouldn't connect you if you called her my maid. 
It is relatively common, but I wish more people knew the difference. A cleaning service/person generally just cleans major areas and fixtures such as floors, sinks, toilets, tubs, dusting; while a maid tidies up after you by washing your dishes, changing your sheets, picking up your clothes strewn all over and washing them etc. A maid does everything so you don't have to, a cleaning service doesn't.  

You can think of a cleaning service like your dishwasher. The maid would scrape, rinse, and load; it just cleans the dishes.
[deleted]
When talking to a third party who doesn't know who the fuck Nancy is, it might save time and confusion to just call her "the maid". 

Parents, siblings, wife, kids, boss, co-workers - I view all these people as human beings and yet, when talking to others, I refer to them by their relation to me rather than randomly injecting their names into conversations. 


I mean I understand that "the janitor"s name is Kevin, but if I don't know his name, he's just "the janitor" to me. Just as "the principal" or "the president of Cyprus". It's a job title; if anyone equates a job title with a social class, that's make *you* classist lolol.
So you’re saying we should get rid of occupation titles all together because “workers are human beings”?
A self-maid man would clean his own house...
I mean, if you want to be even more obvious; he lives in Korea, where almost all people are Korean. Far more likely that she's his partner than his maid. 
Well if you don't know about it then you shouldn't make assumptions and state opinions about it.

Somehow it's more acceptable to make assumptions about a culture you don't know about than to explain the circumstances of that culture?
Everybody makes assumptions about other people hundreds of times a day. Based on what they wear, the way they carry themselves, etc. 

It's a defensive mechanism and it's ingrained in human nature. You do this too, whether you notice it or not. 

FYI you’re being downvoted for being rude. 
Because sarcastically mocking my neutrally-worded explanation wasn't rude?
No, but actually being better then the mass majority of racists out there is. It unfortunatly seems. I'm on your side mate :)


Fuck those downvotes. Bunch of rat fucking, dickheads.
Reddit has an 80% white population, so the perspectives of other ethnicities are not empathized with very often.

I'm used to it.

When there are examples of racism against or unfairly stereotyping white people though, there's a pow-wow and upvotes a-plenty thrown around.
So your argument is basically "Don't make an opinionated, yet ultimately unimportant and inconsequential, comment about anything on the internet, ever, unless you have every bit of info about it"?

If you actually adhere to that, I bet you live a fun life /s
Yep, that's obviously what I'm saying, that there are no gray areas and things only exist in extremes.

Clearly stating that someone shouldn't state opinions on subjects they know nothing about means they have to know everything to talk about it. There are no in-betweens in life, that's a totally reasonable way to have a conversation.

/s
Nah you're with the majority here.
Wasn't he commenting on foreign affairs?
Yeah. I don't recall, by they might actually even say he's reporting from Korea.

I had never seen or heard of the man before the video, yet I recall knowing he was from Korea somehow, so...
Which is why I'm giving an explanation.

Why are people getting offended over that?
[deleted]
> iirc you og comment was "Korea's not the kind of country where you can easily own a maid, you still need to be pretty well-off to do that here."

No it was not. 
> He lives in Korea. Korea's not the kind of country where you can easily own a maid, you still need to be pretty well-off to do that here.

Literally your comment
Thanks for the update. It's not what /u/WeSnawLoL is claiming my comment was.

He's claiming that I left out "He lives in Korea" and edited it in later, which I most definitely did not.
 Ah I see, carry on.
True, idk I'm high, not gonna trust my memory.
I use a service like that. Before they come i clean the shit out of everything easy and then get them to do the stuff i dont want to, like dust the baseboards and around the doors etc. That way to they only come once a month.
This was broadcasted by BBC, in the UK. 
Yes it is expensive... I think you're upper middle class bubble has just popped.
$30,000 at the low end for a live-in maid... Yes, that is prohibitively expensive for 99% of Americans. 
Someone who comes to your house and cleans your shit occasionally isn't a maid.

A maid by definition is someone who performs a general array of domestic duties, of which cleaning is one.

A female cleaner is no more a maid than a male cleaner would be a butler.
Theres a service here called Molly Maids. Its in the fucking name. Lol
So if I name my landscaping service Andy's Astrophysicists, all of my employees automatically become astrophysicists?
Might get into a bit of hot water when you're sued to oblivion for false advertising. So far I don't think any of the plethora of maid services out there that are committing this egregious sin in your eyes have had any issues. 


A maid is not just someone who cleans. A maid's job encompasses general domestic duties, which includes things like grocery shopping, cooking, babysitting, caring for pets, etc. 

A cleaner is just that. A cleaner. Not a maid.
IKR? Fucking human rights or some shit.
My friend is from Nigeria, wealthy family, and he was telling me he would buy people at the market to carry stuff for him for the day, and then he would release them at the end of the day. Apparently the people were only a few hundred dollaroos too. 

I would imagine if you wanted to own a maid, some country I’m Africa is probably your best bet. Perhaps Sudan or Libya, even South Africa has an excellent market for purchasing maids. Although not on the African continent, I hear Saudi Arabia is also good. 
Sounds strikingly like my companies relationship with me! The own me for the day and then release me at a certain point in the evening to be free. 
...which is why I made the comment, to give the context. 

Which people like you are choosing to take offense that I gave the context in the first place.
Acknowledging that you initially had a bias based on race? That's the most progressive thing I've seen all week and I'm not even being sarcastic.

I assumed she was a nanny because  because she looks so different than her kids. I remember the girl had these light brown bouncy curls and Asian genes usually seem more dominant than that I guess.
Me too; I mean, I also don't particularly remember what she was wearing, but I remember it contributing to the maid "vibe" a bit too. But who knows, those kinds of initial judgments are complex and not particularly susceptible to thoughtful or sensitive correction.
It's not likely. People don't generally have maids in Korea. 
>The odds of a local maid to an American expat family are high.

source? 
hey /u/CptComet, waiting for a source here. ready to see it whenever you are. 
I hope he quit Facebook and hit the gym. That's what you're supposed to do, yes? /s
Yes! A pleasant accident in the end.
Big black... what?
>[for a BBC](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RPFZHAA9fV4)
Ahhh. Good old Boston parenting. Makes me nostalgic.
Smaht 
You're in full cognitive dissonance mode

"I'm racist? I can't be. It must be that... Others are wrong!"
Me too. But that's why I'm a vocal.proponent of equality. Lots of white folks get defensive, resistant, even nasty over some sentiments. But I stand my ground because I know first-hand how it affects my spouse and I. 
This happens to my SO and me all the time. We're both white bit he's shorter than me and somehow some people cannot wrap their heads around that fact.  At the grocery store: "Do you want to pay separately?" At the travel agency: "You want to book a vacation? Together? In the same room? You will pay with a card, and you?" Wtf. He's like less than 2" shorter. 
Black people, mostly. 

EDIT: Holy fuck Reddit, It was very clearly a joke within the context here.
Am calling police. Enjoy jail scum man.
Nou
You meant amazing
Reddit Hug Of Death :/
The legends were true 
Checks out.
Honestly?  That would probably produce a better result than the one I've achieved so far.
Do you not?
You clearly haven't seen the pile of laundry that I've been ignoring.
It's also like $80 a roll, I'll use a premium $10 roll of duct tape for 95% of things. 
Green frogger painters tape ftw. Perfect balance of sticks well + removes conpletely.
>  Duct tape will leave sticky residue on the wood, gaff tape won’t as it’s designed to be used for things like securing cords

YES!! I use it like ALL THE TIME!

Before there was always sticky residue left on my victims but now, thanks to gaff tape there's no more evidence of my kidnapping victims being bound. It's a life saver (for me)!
Sounds like you're speaking from experience.
And your kidnapping victims will get away
When his character was....home alone
And he was home alone in that scene.
Gods for the blood blood!
i chuckled :D
Blood power to the proletariat god. 
How surprisingly accurate
Surely he has enough of that already?
that seems somehow too mild.
There's nothing mild about Khorne.
Owning a stake in a maidshare. The hot new property fad.
I just realized the potential for an Uber like maid service.
This guy markets
 sure, in Dubai
Minute Maids.
Murder Maids Cleaning Service. Making all your problems...disappear. 
I hate you and I love you. 
Ugh. 
Also very likely that any maid he would hire would also be Korean
Hm, I don’t think so. I knew he lived in Korea but assumed it was a cleaning lady anyway; it just seemed like it in context 
Why would a cleaning lady be responsible for the children? 
It’s a pretty common practice in Asian countries 
Which Asian country do you mean? Do you realise how big and diverse Asia is? I come from an Asian country and have been to many Asian countries and never encountered that kind of practice 
Well I’m Korean so
In the Philippines, our maid/nanny is called a yaya and they take care of A LOT of things including cooking etc depending on the arrangement you have
Idiots? Yeah.
My mistake. It ended up on US TV after it happened and was all over reddit of course. 
Rekt
He said "prohibitively". And it's not. 
No it isn't expensive. It might be a lot for someone making minimum wage but it isn't expensive. 
Feeling triggered skippy? I didn't say it wasnt expensive. I said that if you have a halfway decent job and you wanted to waste your money on it you could. Also if they come infrequently you might only spend 100 to 200 dollars on them a month. Would I waste that money? Fuck no. Could you get one if you really wanted one? Yes. People waste money on far worse shit. 
>	Having a maid is not uncommon and it’s not prohibitively expensive.
> prohibitively expensive.

Please try to keep up here I don't have a lot of time to waste explaining this to you. 
> prohibitively expensive.

expensive. Not prohibitively expensive. 
Most people don't have a live in maid. A lot of people have someone that comes for an hour every other week or so. 
I wasn't talking about a live in maid. I meant someone that comes to your house once or twice a month and cleans your shit. Obviously someone living in house would be expensive. 
Ah I see the confusion. A cleaner is actually referred to as a cleaner or maid somewhat interchangeably from what I can tell. What you're describing as a maid is called a nanny in here in Korea.

Source: That is my girlfriend's mom's job. Though her job primarily involves the domestic, childcare related aspects of it. Not once has she or her family ever referred to her work as being a maid.
Maid services in America clean your house and that's it. Those other things you mentioned are each their own separate jobs, e.g. chef, babysitter, dog walker,...
You're taking this way too literally and seriously.  
You don't see why it might be annoying at the very least to a Korean that so many people see an Asian woman in a white man's house and instantly assume she's his maid? Even though his children walking in were clearly of Asian descent? 

Then when I explain that he lives in Korea and give context for why she is almost certainly not his maid, it's the people who made the maid assumption that choose to take offense.


You aren't just explaining the situation though.  Your comments are scolding people for even thinking that in the first place.
Scolding? Where? 

I mention in *one* comment that I was annoyed by it. Nowhere did I scold anyone.

The only comment that comes close to "scolding" is:

>Well if you don't know about it then you shouldn't make assumptions and state opinions about it.

Which I only typed because someone decided to be a sarcastic asshole and imply that explaining the situation was overbearing.

The negative replies started rolling in before I made that comment.

If I'm taking this too seriously, then everyone else is too, so we're all on an even playing field. 
Nah, you're right, I misread another comment and thought it was you.  My bad fam
Political correctness gone mad.
Now you are learning your own assumptions on race are wrong.
and expats in korea don't have the money for a maid. 
Delete the gym

Hit Facebook

Lawyer up

Or something like that
Hot the divorce, lawyer Jim, face up.
No no, it's delete the gym, hit the lawyer, and Facebook up
A surprise to be sure but a welcome one
/r/unexpectedpalpatine
Well they are already an interracial couple so may as well...
Ohh! I know this one. It's Cars right?
Yep that's what it is. I'm a full on racist. Lmao, for real pull your head in. That kind of logic might get you by on the internet but it won't do you any favours in real life where you have to actually talk to other human beings.

I'll take it real slow for you one last time though so you can understand it, maybe.

When I first watched that clip, it was just in passing on twitter because someone else had shared it. When I saw the mother slide in all panicked like it made me think of a nanny because I've seen actual nannies with that demeanor when the kids have gotten away from them. Only to realise after the fact she was their mother. I couldn't tell the race of the mother from the brief glimpse I got of a blurry video on my phone. 

Must mean I'm racist. 

For real, pull your head in. 
This isn't just a white thing, mixed couples of any race run into these issues.
I'm certain, but it stems from white normative culture. 
What? What does that even mean?
It means exactly what it says. Culture that inherently others those who aren't white. 

Like how America treats brown people. 
That's just racist bullshit, race mixing was an issue in almost all culture way before "white culture " was dominant.

It turns out most races just want their family and friends to find others physically like them attractive, it's a natural insecurity.

But you just appear to be race baiting nonsense so oh well.
So black people couldn't get bent out of shape over a mixed couple If whites didn't do it first? What about a Japanese man taking exception to his daughter dating a Korean guy? Are white people to blame for that as well?
That’s so messed up! I’m sorry to hear people are shitty like that. My ex was 4 inches taller than me and white (I’m Hispanic) and guys would hit on her in front of me because they assumed we could never possibly be together 🙄
I'll just throw the word confirmation bias in there to play the Devils advocate. In another reddit thread, a fat guy complained about people mobbing him for his moderately obese weight rather than his previous obese weight. His example of a waiter asking him if he wanted "to finish that" (meal) was not a reason to be offended. Commenters told him that it's usual business for waiters and he got defensive about still being right, even though his example was none at all.
Godspeed friend. I hope everything gets better. No one deserves defcon 1
Modern art
I’d suggest bigassfans. Hmmm, I wonder if I should pitch that to them as an ad campaign. “When shit hits the fan, make sure it’s a bigassfan! It’ll spread the shit around with style!”
I've heard this for years working in the music industry, and have still yet to see $80 gaff tape. I think the most I ever paid was $32 for a roll, and that was from the only "production" company around for over 200 miles. Otherwise it's normally less than $25. Which is still expensive for tape, but not $80/roll expensive. 
Experience of working with Ambals, yeah. 
Bloody hells yeah!

source: have blood in me, could be a god on first Tuesdays
Thrones for throne skull?
Good enough.

Let's roll.

*cocks flamethrower*

That's right. I had it modified so you can cock it.
Given that the whore and the corpse on the throne still exist ? No.
Not enough power you say? BRING BLOOD FOR THE BLOOD GOD
I am serious and don't call me Surely
*It's free maid estate*
Fractional maidserve.
Muber? 
Put my stake into a shared maid.
Owning part of a maid.
This conversation is somehow getting more and more uncomfortable. 
Been done, dear. Molly Maid.
Well the place is called "Do Buy".
If I had a party catered, I wouldn’t tell people I “have a chef”. Hiring a cleaning service is not “having a maid”.
But if you had a chef that came to your house and cooked every week or two... You might say that you have a chef. It is very common (in American English at least) to just say "I have a maid" when you hire a maid service. 
I don’t think it is that common at all and I think that if you told people “you have a maid”, a vast majority of them would take that to mean that you have a live-in maid. 
It seems by what people are saying in this thread, it's a lot more common than you think. 
Wrong. Do you live in the US?
There is no place that I’ve been in the US that “having a maid” meant a live in maid unless you are talking to someone who you know is very well off. This includes small towns in the midwest, to Nyc.

I’m guessing you either come from good money or live in a bubble of a community. 

Hell as proof just try and google a “maid near you”.You’ll get a list of house cleaning services. 
Jesus christ yes it fucking is. If you have a maid scheduled 3-4 times a month, guess what, you have a maid. Why is this completely easy to understand point going right over your head somehow? Seriously step back and think about what you're saying. Stop trying so hard to make it seem like the reality isn't what it is. 
Lmao go get some fresh air 
What if he’s typing this outside?
You are correct. 

A maid service doesn't employ actual maids. Maids by definition are employees that perform a wide array of domestic duties, not just cleaning.

Just like a chef isn't a butler.
Maid service employees =/= maids. They're called maid services because that's just what they were advertised as and eventually became known as. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maid_service


And when something becomes known as that... That is it what is. That's how words work and how language evolves. 
You're right, it's now known as a maid service.

Doesn't mean its employees are known as maids. 

inb4 you claim that the 8 people in this comment thread having a misconception of maids is undeniable proof of a shift in the use of the word across all English speakers.
If you actually read through the thread here though, it seems like it's mostly you and 1 or 2 other people that are vehemently defending the traditional definition of what a maid is, while most other people understand that maid and cleaner are pretty much used interchangeably now. Don't let your desire to be technically correct hamper your ability to learn and grow. 
Are you just retarded? 
Yes, I used a different term for the same thing. I like to stretch my vocabulary a bit.
People can be stupid. Hope it didn't bother you much, I try not to notice it and usually people who notice this think it's cute. 
Thanks, friend.  On the (very) bright side, [at least it's warm here](https://i.imgur.com/DdgiuWY.jpg).
I always did enjoy Pollock's work.
It's normally in larger rolls than duct tape. So I pay $20 for a roll of gaffa tape that's twice as big as a $5 roll of duct tape. It sucks when you only need 6 feet but I end up using it.
These is bloody shoes...
Everyone missing the most obvious one, 'proletariat blood for the blood god'
This message was intended for Jim Boonie only. Why did you tell everyone else?! 
Blockchain maid building
Maider?  Hell I hardly know her!
Myft
Maid up your mind about it, eh
Think of it as accumulating some sweat equity that compounds over time.
So it maid you uneasy, eh
